Wisconsin, session 2025, SB431.
do enact as follows:SB431,1Section 1. 111.335 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:111.335 (2) (b) Notwithstanding s. 111.322, it is not employment discrimination because of arrest record to refuse to employ or license, or to suspend from employment or licensing, any individual who is subject to a pending criminal charge if the circumstances of the charge substantially relate to the circumstances of the particular job or licensed activity, except as provided in sub. (4) (a).SB431,2Section 2. 111.335 (4) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:111.335 (4) (a) (intro.) It is employment discrimination because of arrest record for a licensing agency to refuse to license any individual under sub. (2) (b) or to suspend an individual from licensing under sub. (2) (b) solely because the individual is subject to a pending criminal charge, unless the circumstances of the charge substantially relate to the circumstances of the particular licensed activity and the charge is for any of the following: Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb431 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb431 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB431 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB431 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB431: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting